Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RICHFIELD; NICOLLET AVENUE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $10,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Richfield, Hennepin County, or both to design and construct approximately 1.4 miles of roadway, and active transportation and public utility infrastructure, including replacement of water main, sanitary sewer main, and storm sewer main on Nicollet Avenue (County State-Aid Highway 52) from 77th Street to 66th Street (County State-Aid Highway 53) and other streets to support construction of Nicollet Avenue in the city. This appropriation includes money for predesign necessary to complete the project and for the acquisition of real property or right-of-way or easement acquisition within the corridor. This appropriation is for the city's local cost-share and is to be used in cooperation with Hennepin County for the Nicollet Avenue (County State-Aid Highway 52) reconstruction project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $10,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end